California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
The court may, when the convenience of witnesses, the ends of justice, or the economy and efficiency of handling the litigation would be promoted thereby, on motion of a party, after notice and hearing, make an order, no later than the close of pretrial conference in cases in which such pretrial conference is to be held, or, in other cases, no later than 30 days before the trial date, that the trial of any issue or any part thereof shall precede the trial of any other issue or any part thereof in the case, except for special defenses which may be tried first pursuant to Sections 597 and 597.5. The court, on its own motion, may make such an order at any time. Where trial of
 the issue of liability as to all causes of action precedes the trial of other issues or parts thereof, and the decision of the court, or the verdict of the jury upon such issue so tried is in favor of any party on whom liability is sought to be imposed, judgment in favor of such party shall thereupon be entered and no trial of other issues in the action as against such party shall be had unless such judgment shall be reversed upon appeal or otherwise set aside or vacated.

If the decision of the court, or the verdict of the jury upon the issue of liability so tried shall be against any party on whom liability is sought to be imposed, or if the decision of the court or the verdict of the jury upon any other issue or part thereof so tried does not result in a judgment being entered pursuant to this chapter, then the trial of the other issues or parts thereof shall thereafter be had at such time, and if a jury trial, before the same or another jury, as ordered by the
 court either upon its own motion or upon the motion of any party, and judgment shall be entered in the same manner and with the same effect as if all the issues in the case had been tried at one time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 349.)
-------------------------------------------

599.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law and unless ordered otherwise by a court or otherwise agreed to by the parties, a continuance or postponement of a trial or arbitration date extends any deadlines that have not already passed as of March 19, 2020, applicable to discovery, including the exchange of expert witness information, mandatory settlement conferences, and summary judgment motions in the same matter. The deadlines are extended for the same length of time as the continuance or postponement of the trial date.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only during the state of emergency proclaimed by the Governor on March 4, 2020, related to the COVID-19 pandemic and 180 days after
 the end, pursuant to Section 8629 of the Government Code, of that state of emergency and is repealed on that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 214, Sec. 6.   (SB 241)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Conditionally repealed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Trial by Jury [607. - 630.]



  ARTICLE 2. Conduct of the Trial [607. - 619.]

607.

When the jury has been sworn, the trial must proceed in the following order, unless the court, for special reasons otherwise directs:

1. The plaintiff may state the issue and his case;

2. The defendant may then state his defense, if he so wishes, or wait until after plaintiff has produced his evidence;

3. The plaintiff must then produce the evidence on his part;

4. The defendant may then open his defense, if he has
not done so previously; 

5. The defendant may then produce the evidence on his part;

6. The parties may then respectively offer rebutting evidence only, unless the court, for good reason, in furtherance of justice, permit them to offer evidence upon their original case;

7. When the evidence is concluded, unless the case is submitted to the jury on either side or on both sides without argument, the plaintiff must commence and may conclude the argument;

8. If several defendants having separate defenses, appear by different counsel, the court must determine their relative order in the evidence and argument;

9. The court may then charge the jury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 841.)
-------------------------------------------

607a.

In every case which is being tried before the court with a jury, it shall be the duty of counsel for the respective parties, before the first witness is sworn, to deliver to the judge presiding at the trial and serve upon opposing counsel, all proposed instructions to the jury covering the law as disclosed by the pleadings. Thereafter, and before the commencement of the argument, counsel may deliver to such judge, and serve upon opposing counsel, additional proposed instructions to the jury upon questions of law developed by the evidence and not disclosed by the pleadings. All proposed instructions shall be typewritten, each on a separate sheet of paper. Before the
commencement of the argument, the court, on request of counsel, must: (1) decide whether to give, refuse, or modify the proposed instructions; (2) decide which instructions shall be given in addition to those proposed, if any; and (3) advise counsel of all instructions to be given. However, if, during the argument, issues are raised which have not been covered by instructions given or refused, the court may, on request of counsel, give additional instructions on the subject matter thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1698.)
-------------------------------------------

608.

In charging the jury the Court may state to them all matters of law which it thinks necessary for their information in giving their verdict; and, if it state the testimony of the case, it must inform the jury that they are the exclusive judges of all questions of fact. The Court must furnish to either party, at the time, upon request, a statement in writing of the points of law contained in the charge, or sign, at the time, a statement of such points prepared and submitted by the counsel of either party.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

609.

Where either party asks special instructions to be given to the jury, the Court must either give such instruction, as requested, or refuse to do so, or give the instruction with a modification, in such manner that it may distinctly appear what instructions were given in whole or in part.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

611.

If the jury are permitted to separate, either during the trial or after the case is submitted to them, they shall be admonished by the court that it is their duty not to conduct research, disseminate information, or converse with, or permit themselves to be addressed by, any other person on any subject of the trial, and that it is their duty not to form or express an opinion thereon until the case is finally submitted to
them. The court shall clearly explain, as part of the admonishment, that the prohibition on research, dissemination of information, and conversation applies to all forms of electronic and wireless communication.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 181, Sec. 1.   (AB 141)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

612.

Upon retiring for deliberation the jury may take with them all papers which have been received as evidence in the cause, except depositions, or copies of such papers as ought not, in the opinion of the court, to be taken from the person having them in possession; and they may also take with them any exhibits which the court may deem proper, notes of the testimony or other proceedings on the trial, taken by themselves or any of them, but none taken by any other person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 753.)
-------------------------------------------

612.5.

Upon the jury retiring for deliberation, the court shall advise the jury of the availability of a written copy of the jury instructions. The court may, at its discretion, provide the jury with a copy of the written instructions given. However, if the jury requests the court to supply a copy of the written instructions, the court shall supply the jury with a copy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1045, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

613.

When the case is finally submitted to the jury, they may decide in court or retire for deliberation. If they retire, they must be kept together in some convenient place, under charge of an officer, until at least three-fourths of them agree upon a verdict or are discharged by the court. Unless by order of the court, the officer having them under his or her charge shall not permit any communication to be made to them,
including any form of electronic or wireless communication, or make any himself or herself, except to ask them if they or three-fourths of them are agreed upon a verdict. The officer shall not, before their verdict is rendered, communicate to any person the state of their deliberations, or the verdict agreed upon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 181, Sec. 2.   (AB 141)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

614.

After the jury have retired for deliberation, if there be a disagreement between them as to any part of the testimony, or if they desire to be informed of any point of law arising in the cause, they may require the officer to conduct them into Court. Upon their being brought into Court, the information required must be given in the presence of, or after notice to, the parties or counsel.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

614.5.

Except for good cause shown, the judge in his or her discretion need not be present in the court while testimony previously received in evidence is read to the jury.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 88, Sec. 1.   Effective July 2, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

616.

In all cases where the jury are discharged without having rendered a verdict, or are prevented from giving a verdict, by reason of accident or other cause, during the progress of the trial, or after the cause is submitted to them, except as provided in Section 630, the action may be again tried immediately, or at a future time, as the court may direct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 984.)
-------------------------------------------

617.

While the jury are absent the Court may adjourn from time to time, in respect to other business; but it is nevertheless open for every purpose connected with the cause submitted to the jury, until a verdict is rendered or the jury discharged. The Court may direct the jury to bring in a sealed verdict, at the opening of the Court, in case of an agreement during a recess or adjournment for the day.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1880, Ch. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

618.

When the jury, or three-fourths of them, have agreed upon a verdict, they must be conducted into court and the verdict rendered by their foreperson. The verdict must be in writing, signed by the foreperson, and must be read to the jury by the clerk, and the inquiry made whether it is their verdict. Either party may require the jury to be polled, which is done by the court or clerk, asking each juror if it is the juror’s verdict. If upon inquiry or polling, more than one-fourth of the jurors disagree thereto, the jury must be sent out again, but if no
disagreement is expressed, the verdict is complete and the jury discharged from the case.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 263, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

619.

When the verdict is announced, if it is informal or insufficient, in not covering the issue submitted, it may be corrected by the jury under the advice of the Court, or the jury may be again sent out.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. The Verdict [624. - 630.]

624.

The verdict of a jury is either general or special. A general verdict is that by which they pronounce generally upon all or any of the issues, either in favor of the plaintiff or defendant; a special verdict is that by which the jury find the facts only, leaving the judgment to the Court. The special verdict must present the conclusions of fact as established by the evidence, and not the evidence to prove them; and those conclusions of fact must be so presented as that nothing shall remain to the Court but to draw from them conclusions of law.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

625.

In all cases the court may direct the jury to find a special verdict in writing, upon all, or any of the issues, and in all cases may instruct them, if they render a general verdict, to find upon particular questions of fact, to be stated in writing, and may direct a written finding thereon. In all cases in which the issue of punitive damages is presented to the jury the court shall direct the jury to find a special verdict in writing separating punitive damages from compensatory damages. The special verdict or finding must be filed with the clerk and entered upon the minutes. Where a special finding of facts is inconsistent with the general verdict,
the former controls the latter, and the court must give judgment accordingly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 176, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

626.

When a verdict is found for the plaintiff in an action for the recovery of money, or for the cross-complainant when a cross-complaint for the recovery of money is established, the jury must also find the amount of the recovery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 244.)
-------------------------------------------

[627.]

Section Six Hundred and Twenty-seven. In an action for the recovery of specific personal property, if the property has not been delivered to the plaintiff, or the defendant, by his answer, claim a return thereof, the jury, if their verdict be in favor of the plaintiff, or, if being in favor of defendant, they also find that he is entitled to a return thereof, must find the value of the property, and, if so instructed, the value of specific portions thereof, and may at the same time assess the damages, if any are claimed in the complaint or answer, which the prevailing party has sustained by reason of the taking or detention of such
property.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 383.)
-------------------------------------------

628.

In superior courts upon receipt of a verdict, an entry must be made in the minutes of the court, specifying the time of trial, the names of the jurors and witnesses, and setting out the verdict at length; and where a special verdict is found, either the judgment rendered thereon, or if the case be reserved for argument or further consideration, the order thus reserving it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 63.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

629.

(a) The court, before the expiration of its power to rule on a motion for a new trial, either of its own motion, after five days’ notice, or on motion of a party against whom a verdict has been rendered, shall render judgment in favor of the aggrieved party notwithstanding the verdict whenever a motion for a directed verdict for the aggrieved party should have been granted had a previous motion been
made.

(b) A motion for judgment notwithstanding the verdict shall be made within the period specified by Section 659 for the filing and service of a notice of intention to move for a new trial. The moving, opposing, and reply briefs and any accompanying documents shall be filed and served within the periods specified by Section 659a, and the hearing on the motion shall be set in the same manner as the hearing on a motion for new trial under Section 660. The making of a motion for judgment notwithstanding the verdict shall not extend the time within which a party may file and serve notice of intention to move for a new trial. The court shall not rule upon the motion for judgment notwithstanding the verdict until the expiration of the time within which a motion for a new trial must be served and filed, and if a motion for a new trial has been filed with the court by the aggrieved party, the court shall rule upon both motions at the same time. The
power of the court to rule on a motion for judgment notwithstanding the verdict shall not extend beyond the last date upon which it has the power to rule on a motion for a new trial. If a motion for judgment notwithstanding the verdict is not determined before that date, the effect shall be a denial of that motion without further order of the court.

(c) If the motion for judgment notwithstanding the verdict is denied and if a new trial is denied, the appellate court shall, if it appears that the motion for judgment notwithstanding the verdict should have been granted, order judgment to be so entered on appeal from the judgment or from the order denying the motion for judgment notwithstanding the verdict.

(d) If a new trial is granted to the party moving for judgment notwithstanding the verdict, and the motion for judgment notwithstanding the verdict is denied, the order denying
the motion for judgment notwithstanding the verdict shall nevertheless be reviewable on appeal from that order by the aggrieved party. If the court grants the motion for judgment notwithstanding the verdict or of its own motion directs the entry of judgment notwithstanding the verdict and likewise grants the motion for a new trial, the order granting the new trial shall be effective only if, on appeal, the judgment notwithstanding the verdict is reversed, and the order granting a new trial is not appealed from or, if appealed from, is affirmed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 40.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

630.

(a) Unless the court specified an earlier time for making a motion for directed verdict, after all parties have completed the presentation of all of their evidence in a trial by jury, any party may, without waiving his or her right to trial by jury in the event the motion is not granted, move for an order directing entry of a verdict in its favor.

(b) If it appears that the evidence presented supports the granting of the motion as to some, but not all, of the issues involved in the action, the court shall grant the motion as to those issues and the action shall
proceed on any remaining issues. Despite the granting of such a motion, no final judgment shall be entered prior to the termination of the action, but the final judgment, in addition to any matter determined in the trial, shall reflect the verdict ordered by the court as determined by the motion for directed verdict.

(c) If the motion is granted, unless the court in its order directing entry of the verdict specifies otherwise, it shall operate as an adjudication upon the merits.

(d) In actions which arise out of an injury to a person or property, when a motion for directed verdict was granted on the basis that a defendant was without fault, no other defendant during trial, over plaintiff’s objection, shall attempt to attribute fault to or comment on the absence or involvement of the defendant who was granted the motion.

(e) The order of the court granting the motion for directed verdict is effective without any assent of the jury.

(f) When the jury for any reason has been discharged without having rendered a verdict, the court on its own motion or upon motion of a party, notice of which was given within 10 days after discharge of the jury, may order judgment to be entered in favor of a party whenever a motion for directed verdict for that party should have been granted had a previous motion been made. Except as otherwise provided in Section 12a, the power of the court to act under the provisions of this section shall expire 30 days after the day upon which the jury was discharged, and if judgment has not been ordered within that time the effect shall be the denial of any motion for judgment without further order of the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 540, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.5. Voluntary Expedited Jury Trials [630.01. - 630.11.]

630.01.

For purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Expedited jury trial” means a consensual, binding jury trial before a reduced jury panel and a judicial officer.

(b) “High/low agreement” means a written agreement entered into by the parties that specifies a minimum amount of damages that a plaintiff is
 guaranteed to receive from the defendant, and a maximum amount of damages that the defendant will be liable for, regardless of the ultimate verdict returned by the jury. Neither the existence of, nor the amounts contained in, any high/low agreements may be disclosed to the jury.

(c) “Post-trial motions” does not include motions relating to costs and attorney’s fees, motions to correct a judgment for a clerical error, and motions to enforce a judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 37.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

630.02.

The rules and procedures applicable to expedited jury trials are as follows:

(a) The procedures in this chapter and in the implementing rules of court shall apply to expedited jury trials, unless the parties agree otherwise, as permitted under subparagraph (E) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 630.03, and the court so orders.

(b) Any matters not expressly addressed in this chapter, in the implementing rules of court, or in a consent order authorized by this chapter and the implementing rules, are governed by applicable statutes and rules governing civil actions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 674, Sec. 2.   (AB 2284)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

630.03.

(a) All parties agreeing to participate in an expedited jury trial and, if represented, their counsel, shall sign a proposed consent order granting an expedited jury trial.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (d), the agreement to participate in the expedited jury trial process is binding upon the parties, unless either of the following
 occurs:

(1) All parties stipulate to end the agreement to participate.

(2) The court, on its own motion or at the request of a party by noticed motion, finds that good cause exists for the action not to proceed under the rules of this chapter.

(c) Any agreement to participate in an expedited jury trial under this chapter may be entered into only after a dispute has arisen and an action has been filed.

(d) The court shall approve the use of an expedited jury trial and any high/low agreements or other stipulations for an expedited jury trial involving either of the following:

(1) A self-represented litigant.

(2) A minor, an
 incompetent person, or a person for whom a conservator has been appointed.

(e) The proposed consent order submitted to the court shall include all of the following:

(1) A preliminary statement that each named party and any insurance carrier responsible for providing coverage or defense on behalf of that party, individually identified in the proposed consent order, have been informed of the rules and procedures for an expedited jury trial and provided with a Judicial Council information sheet regarding expedited jury trials, have agreed to take part in or, in the case of a responsible insurance carrier, not object to, the expedited jury trial process, and have agreed to all the specific provisions set forth in the consent order.

(2) The parties’ agreement to all of the following:

(A) That all parties waive all rights to appeal and to move for directed verdict or make any post-trial motions, except as provided in Sections 630.08 and 630.09.

(B) That each side shall have up to five hours in which to complete voir dire and to present its case.

(C) That the jury shall be composed of eight or fewer jurors with no alternates.

(D) That each side shall be limited to three peremptory challenges, unless the court permits an additional challenge in cases with more than two sides as provided in Section 630.04.

(E) That the trial and pretrial matters will proceed under subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, and, unless the parties expressly agree otherwise in the proposed consent
 order, under all other provisions in this chapter and in the implementing rules of court.

(f) The court shall issue the consent order as proposed by the parties, unless the court finds good cause why the action should not proceed through the expedited jury trial process, in which case the court shall deny the proposed consent order in its entirety.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 330, Sec. 2.   (AB 555)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

630.04.

(a) Juries in expedited jury trial cases shall be composed of eight jurors, unless the parties have agreed to fewer. No alternates shall be selected.

(b) The court shall allow each side three peremptory challenges. If there are more than two parties in a case and more than two sides, as determined by the court under subdivision (c) of
 Section 231, the parties may request one additional peremptory challenge each, which is to be granted by the court as the interests of justice may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 674, Sec. 2.   (AB 2284)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

630.05.

Nothing in this chapter is intended to preclude a jury from deliberating as long as needed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 674, Sec. 2.   (AB 2284)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

630.06.

(a) The rules of evidence apply in expedited jury trials, unless the parties stipulate otherwise.

(b) Any stipulation by the parties to use relaxed rules of evidence may not be construed to eliminate, or in any way affect, the right of a witness or party to invoke any applicable privilege or other law protecting confidentiality.

(c) The right to issue subpoenas and notices to appear to secure the attendance of witnesses or the production of documents at trial shall be in accordance with this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 674, Sec. 2.   (AB 2284)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

630.07.

(a) The verdict in an expedited jury trial case is binding, subject to any written high/low agreement or other stipulations concerning the amount of the award agreed upon by the parties.

(b) A vote of six of the eight jurors is required for a verdict, unless the parties stipulate otherwise.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 674, Sec. 2.   (AB 2284)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

630.08.

(a) By agreeing to participate in the expedited jury trial process, the parties agree to waive any motions for directed verdict, motions to set aside the verdict or any judgment rendered by the jury, or motions for a new trial on the basis of inadequate or excessive damages.

(b) The court shall not set aside any verdict or any judgment,
 shall not direct that judgment be entered in favor of a party entitled to judgment as a matter of law, and shall not order a new trial, except on the grounds stated in Section 630.09.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 38.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

630.09.

(a) By agreeing to participate in the expedited jury trial process, the parties agree to waive the right to bring post-trial motions or to appeal from the determination of the matter, except as provided in this section. The only grounds on which a party may move for a new trial or appeal are any of the following:

(1) Judicial misconduct that
 materially affected the substantial rights of a party.

(2) Misconduct of the jury.

(3) Corruption, fraud, or other undue means employed in the proceedings of the court, jury, or adverse party that prevented a party from having a fair trial.

(b) Within 10 court days of the entry of a jury verdict, a party may file with the clerk and serve on each adverse party a notice of the intention to move for a new trial on any of the grounds specified in subdivision (a). The notice shall be deemed to be a motion for a new trial.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (b), parties to an expedited jury trial shall not make any post-trial motions except for motions relating to costs and attorney’s fees, motions to correct a judgment for clerical error, and motions to
 enforce a judgment.

(d) Before filing an appeal, a party shall make a motion for a new trial under subdivision (b). If the motion for a new trial is denied, the party may appeal the judgment to the appropriate court with appellate jurisdiction and seek a new trial on any of the grounds specified in subdivision (a). Parties to an expedited jury trial may not appeal on any other ground.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 674, Sec. 2.   (AB 2284)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

630.10.

All statutes and rules governing costs and attorney’s fees shall apply in expedited jury trials, unless the parties agree otherwise in the consent order.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 674, Sec. 2.   (AB 2284)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

630.11.

The Judicial Council shall, on or before July 1, 2016, update rules and forms to establish uniform procedures implementing the provisions of this chapter, including, but not limited to, rules for all of the following:

(a) Additional content of proposed consent orders.

(b) Pretrial exchanges and
 submissions.

(c) Pretrial conferences.

(d) Presentation of evidence and testimony.

(e) Any other procedures necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 330, Sec. 3.   (AB 555)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.6. Mandatory Expedited Jury Trials in Limited Civil Cases [630.20. - 630.29.]

630.20.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), an action or special proceeding treated as a limited civil case pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 85) of Chapter 5.1 of Title 1 of Part 1, including an action or special proceeding initially filed as a limited civil case or remanded as one thereafter, shall be conducted as a mandatory expedited jury trial pursuant to this chapter.

(b) Either party may opt out of the mandatory expedited jury trial procedures if any of the following criteria is met:

(1) Punitive damages are sought.

(2) Damages in excess of insurance policy limits are sought.

(3) A party’s insurer is providing a legal defense subject to a reservation of rights.

(4) The case involves a claim reportable to a governmental entity.

(5) The case involves a claim of moral turpitude that may affect an individual’s professional licensing.

(6) The case involves claims of intentional conduct.

(7) The case has been reclassified as unlimited pursuant to Section 403.020.

(8) The complaint contains a demand for attorney’s fees, unless those fees are sought pursuant to Section 1717 of the Civil Code.

(9) The judge finds good cause exists for the action not to proceed under the rules of this chapter. Good cause includes, but is not limited to, a showing that a party needs more than five hours to present or defend the action and that the parties have been unable to stipulate to additional time.

(c) This chapter does not apply to a proceeding in forcible entry or forcible or unlawful detainer.

(d) A judgment in a limited civil case conducted as a mandatory expedited jury trial may be
 appealed to the appellate division of the superior court in which the case was tried.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 330, Sec. 5.   (AB 555)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative July 1, 2016, pursuant to Section 630.29.)
-------------------------------------------

630.21.

For purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Mandatory expedited jury trial” means a jury trial before a reduced jury panel and a judge, conducted pursuant to this chapter.

(b) “High/low agreement” means a written agreement entered into by the parties that specifies a minimum amount of damages that a
 plaintiff is guaranteed to receive from the defendant, and a maximum amount of damages that the defendant will be liable for, regardless of the ultimate verdict returned by the jury. Neither the existence of, nor the amounts contained in, any high/low agreements may be disclosed to the jury.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 330, Sec. 5.   (AB 555)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative July 1, 2016, pursuant to Section 630.29.)
-------------------------------------------

630.22.

(a) The procedures in this chapter and in the implementing rules of court shall apply to mandatory expedited jury trials conducted in limited civil cases, unless the parties agree otherwise, as permitted under subdivision (d) of Section 630.23, and the court so orders.

(b) Any matters not expressly addressed in this chapter, in the
 implementing rules of court, or in an agreement authorized by this chapter and the implementing rules, are governed by applicable statutes and rules governing civil actions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 330, Sec. 5.   (AB 555)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative July 1, 2016, pursuant to Section 630.29.)
-------------------------------------------

630.23.

The following rules and procedures apply to mandatory expedited jury trials conducted pursuant to this chapter:

(a) Each side shall have up to five hours in which to complete voir dire and to present its case.

(b) The jury shall be composed of eight jurors and one alternate, unless the parties have
 agreed to fewer jurors.

(c) Each side shall be limited to four peremptory challenges, unless the court permits an additional challenge in cases with more than two sides. If there are more than two parties in a case and more than two sides, as determined by the court under subdivision (c) of Section 231, the parties may request one additional peremptory challenge each, which is to be granted by the court as the interests of justice may require.

(d) The parties may agree to modify the rules and procedures specified in this chapter and the implementing rules of court, subject to the court’s approval.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 330, Sec. 5.   (AB 555)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative July 1, 2016, pursuant to Section 630.29.)
-------------------------------------------

630.24.

Nothing in this chapter is intended to preclude a jury from deliberating as long as needed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 330, Sec. 5.   (AB 555)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative July 1, 2016, pursuant to Section 630.29.)
-------------------------------------------

630.25.

(a) The rules of evidence apply to mandatory expedited jury trials conducted in limited civil cases, unless the parties stipulate otherwise.

(b) Any stipulation by the parties to use relaxed rules of evidence shall not be construed to eliminate, or in any way affect, the right of a witness or party to invoke any applicable privilege or other
 law protecting confidentiality.

(c) The right to issue subpoenas and notices to appear to secure the attendance of witnesses or the production of documents at trial shall be in accordance with this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 330, Sec. 5.   (AB 555)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative July 1, 2016, pursuant to Section 630.29.)
-------------------------------------------

630.26.

(a) A vote of six of the eight jurors is required for a verdict, unless the parties stipulate otherwise.

(b) The verdict in a limited civil case following a mandatory expedited jury trial case shall be appealable under subdivision (d) of Section 630.20 and subject to any written high/low agreement or other stipulations concerning the amount
 of the award agreed upon by the parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 330, Sec. 5.   (AB 555)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative July 1, 2016, pursuant to Section 630.29.)
-------------------------------------------

630.27.

All statutes and rules governing costs and attorney’s fees shall apply in limited civil cases that are conducted as mandatory expedited jury trials, unless the parties stipulate otherwise.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 330, Sec. 5.   (AB 555)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative July 1, 2016, pursuant to Section 630.29.)
-------------------------------------------

630.28.

The Judicial Council shall, on or before July 1, 2016, adopt rules and forms to establish uniform procedures implementing the provisions of this chapter, including, rules for the following:

(a) Pretrial exchanges and submissions.

(b) Pretrial conferences.

(c) Opt-out procedures pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 630.20.

(d) Presentation of evidence and testimony.

(e) Any other procedures necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 330, Sec. 5.   (AB 555)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

630.29.

Sections 630.20 to 630.27, inclusive, shall become operative on July 1, 2016.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 330, Sec. 5.   (AB 555)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Trial by the Court [631. - 636.]

631.

(a) The right to a trial by jury as declared by Section 16 of Article I of the California Constitution shall be preserved to the parties inviolate. In civil cases, a jury may only be waived pursuant to subdivision (f).

(b) At least one party demanding a jury on each side of a civil case shall pay a nonrefundable fee of one hundred fifty
 dollars ($150), unless the fee has been paid by another party on the same side of the case. The fee shall offset the costs to the state of providing juries in civil cases. If there are more than two parties to the case, for purposes of this section only, all plaintiffs shall be considered one side of the case, and all other parties shall be considered the other side of the case. Payment of the fee by a party on one side of the case shall not relieve parties on the other side of the case from waiver pursuant to subdivision (f).

(c) The fee described in subdivision (b) shall be due on or before the date scheduled for the initial case management conference in the action, except as follows:

(1) In unlawful detainer actions, the fees shall be due at least five days before the date set for trial.

(2) If no case management
 conference is scheduled in a civil action, or the initial case management conference occurred before June 28, 2012, and the initial complaint was filed on or after July 1, 2011, the fee shall be due no later than 365 calendar days after the filing of the initial complaint.

(3) If the initial case management conference occurred before June 28, 2012, and the initial complaint in the case was filed before July 1, 2011, the fee shall be due at least 25 calendar days before the date initially set for trial.

(4) If the party requesting a jury has not appeared before the initial case management conference, or first appeared more than 365 calendar days after the filing of the initial complaint, the fee shall be due at least 25 calendar days before the date initially set for trial.
